District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.01

Definitions

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 2, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(a), 45 DCR 5187
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 2401(a), 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 128(a), 47 DCR 520
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 233(a), 50 DCR 5668
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-286, § 3(a), 52 DCR 859
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2295.1.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation Eminent Domain Clarification and Skyland Eminent Domain Approval Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-193, Sept. 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9804).
D.C. Law 17-53, §§ 103, 104, and 601 repealed provisions as follows:
“Sec. 103. (a) The National Capital Revitalization Corporation Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-144; D.C. Official Code § 2-1219.01 et seq.), is repealed.
“(b) This section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.
“Sec. 104. (a) The Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Act of 2004, effective December 7, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-219; D.C. Official Code § 2-1223.01 et seq.), is repealed.
“(b) This section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”
“TITLE VI. CONFORMING AMENDMENTS.
“Sec. 601. Subtitle P of Title II of the Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Act of 2007, signed by the Mayor on June 28, 2007 (D.C. Act 17-63), is repealed.”
Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provides that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2001(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and see § 2001(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2001(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 233(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 233(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of National Capital Revitalization Corporation Eminent Domain Clarification and Skyland Eminent Domain Approval Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-440, May 21, 2004, 51 DCR 5967).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of National Capital Revitalization Corporation Eminent Domain Clarification and Skyland Eminent Domain Approval Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-515, August 2,

Effective Dates

Section 103(b) of Law 17-138 provided that this section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.

Editor's Notes

Establishment—Task Force on Commercial and Residential Development, see Mayor’s Order 2001-149, October 3, 2001 ( 48 DCR 9526).

Establishment—Task Force on the Impact of the Terrorist Attacks on the District Economy and Consumer Confidence, see Mayor’s Order 2001-151, October 3, 2001 ( 48 DCR 9531).